Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.050

Reports to law enforcement—Records exempt from public disclosure—Private civil liability. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) Upon request by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, every scrap metal business shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the records from the purchase or receipt of private metal property, nonferrous metal property, and commercial metal property involving only a specified individual, vehicle, or item of private metal property, nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property. This information may be transmitted within a specified time of not less than two business days to the applicable law enforcement agency electronically, by facsimile transmission, or by modem or similar device, or by delivery of computer disk subject to the requirements of, and approval by, the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

(2) Any records created or produced under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) If the scrap metal business has good cause to believe that any private metal property, nonferrous metal property, or commercial metal property in his or her possession has been previously lost or stolen, the scrap metal business shall promptly report that fact to the applicable commissioned law enforcement officer of the state, the chief of police, or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person from whom it was received.

(4) Compliance with this section shall not give rise to or form the basis of private civil liability on the part of a scrap metal business or scrap metal recycler.

[ 2013 c 322 s 8; 2008 c 233 s 5; 2007 c 377 s 5.]

PDFRCW 19.290.050

Reports to law enforcement—Records exempt from public disclosure—Private civil liability. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) In addition to all other requirements of this chapter, upon request by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions, every scrap metal business shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the records from the purchase or receipt of nonferrous metal property and commercial metal property involving only a specified individual, vehicle, or item of nonferrous metal property or commercial metal property. This information may be transmitted within a specified time of not less than two business days to the applicable law enforcement agency electronically, by facsimile transmission, or by modem or similar device, or by delivery of computer disk subject to the requirements of, and approval by, the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

(2) Any records created or produced under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) If the scrap metal business has good cause to believe that any nonferrous metal property or commercial metal property in their possession has been previously lost or stolen, the scrap metal business shall promptly report that fact to the applicable commissioned law enforcement officer of the state, the chief of police, or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person from whom it was received.

(4) Compliance with this section shall not give rise to or form the basis of private civil liability on the part of a scrap metal business or scrap metal recycler.

[ 2024 c 301 s 7; 2013 c 322 s 8; 2008 c 233 s 5; 2007 c 377 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.